Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.158

Certain plans 2 and 3 normal costs—Minimum member contribution rates.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, a minimum contribution rate is established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as part of the required contribution rate for members of plan 2 of the public employees' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the plans 2 and 3 employee normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employee normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method.

(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, a minimum contribution rate is established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as part of the required contribution rate for members of plan 2 of the school employees' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the plans 2 and 3 employee normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employee normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method.

(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, a minimum contribution rate is established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as part of the required contribution rate for members of plan 2 of the teachers' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the plans 2 and 3 employee normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employee normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method.

(4) A minimum contribution rate is established for the plan 2 normal cost as part of the basic member contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system. The council may not adopt changes to the minimum contribution rate for plan 2 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under subsection (5) of this section. On June 30th of each even-numbered year, if the funded status of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as measured by the most recent completed actuarial valuation performed by the office of the state actuary is:

(a) Less than 105 percent, then the minimum contribution rate for the member normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund 100 percent of the plan 2 member normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method;

(b) Greater than or equal to 105 percent and less than 110 percent, then the minimum contribution rate for the member normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund 90 percent of the plan 2 member normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method; or

(c) Greater than or equal to 110 percent, then the minimum contribution rate for the employer and state normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund 80 percent of the plan 2 employer normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method.

(5) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of these minimum contribution rates and recommend to the legislature any adjustments as may be needed due to material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience.

[ 2022 c 125 s 5; 2006 c 365 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 365: See note following RCW 41.45.020.